Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIV Descent, Wills, and Administration of Decedents’ Estates
Miscellaneous Provisions

393A.840.
Uniformity
of application and construction.

In applying and construing this chapter, consideration
shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect
to its subject matter among states that enact the Revised Uniform
Unclaimed Property Act.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 84, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.850.
Relation
to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

This chapter modifies, limits, or supersedes 15

U.S.C. secs. 7001

et seq.,
but does not modify, limit, or supersede 15

U.S.C. sec. 7001(c)

, or
authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in 15

U.S.C. sec. 7003(b)

.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 85, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.860.
Transitional
provision.

An initial report filed under this chapter for property that was not required to be reported before July 14, 2018, but that is required to be reported under this chapter, shall include all items of property that would have been presumed abandoned during the ten (10) year period preceding July 14, 2018, as if this chapter had been in effect during that period.

This chapter shall not relieve a holder of a duty that arose before July 14, 2018 to report, pay, or deliver property. Subject to KRS 393A.390(2) and (3), a holder that did not comply with the law governing unclaimed property before July 14, 2018 shall be subject to applicable provisions for enforcement and penalties in effect before July 14, 2018.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 86, effective July 14, 2018.